Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.050

Additional trust offices.

An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in this state under this chapter may establish or acquire additional trust offices in this state to the same extent that a state trust company may establish or acquire additional offices in this state.

[ 2014 c 37 s 371.]